New York, session 2025-2026, S4134.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "Lydia Peikon Cotz act". 3 § 2. Section 3104 of the civil practice law and rules is amended by 4 adding a new subdivision (f) to read as follows: 5 (f) Whenever a party is protected by an order of protection issued 6 under section eight hundred forty-two of the family court act or a 7 protective order issued under subdivision one of section 530.12 of the 8 criminal procedure law, upon application, the court shall provide a 9 secure location within the courthouse, and a court officer, for taking 10 the deposition of either the party or the opposing party. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07694-01-5